Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; METROPOLITAN COUNCIL.new text end new text begin $11,050,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $21,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for grants to operate and maintain metropolitan area regional parks according to Minnesota Statutes, section 473.351. new text end